Hawaii statutes.
§138-6 Report to the legislature.
The board shall submit an annual report to the legislature, including:

(1) The total aggregate surcharge collected by the
State in the last fiscal year;

(2) The amount of disbursement from the fund;

(3) The recipient of each disbursement and a
description of the project for which the money was disbursed;

(4) The conditions, if any, placed by the board on
disbursements from the fund;

(5) The planned expenditures from the fund in the
next fiscal year;

(6) The amount of any unexpended funds carried
forward for the next fiscal year;

(7) A cost study to guide the legislature towards
necessary adjustments to the fund and the monthly surcharge; and

(8) A status report of jurisdictional capabilities
for enhanced 911 services, including public safety answering points and
communications service providers. [L 2004, c 159, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 168,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next